Utah statutes.
58-79-502.   Unprofessional conduct.

"Unprofessional conduct" includes, in addition to the definition in Section 58-1-501, and as may be further defined by rule:

(1)  engaging in an activity that would place a licensee's client, prospective client, or third party's safety at risk, recognizing the inherent risks associated with hunting wildlife and the activity engaged in being above and beyond those inherent risks;

(2)  using false, deceptive, or misleading advertising related to providing services as a hunting guide or outfitter; and

(3)  misrepresenting services, outcomes, facilities, equipment, or fees to a client or prospective client.



Enacted by Chapter 52, 2009 General Session

